Utah statutes.
31A-35-602.   Place of business -- Records to be kept there.
(1) (a)  Every bail bond surety company shall have and maintain in this state
a place of business:
(i)  accessible to the public; and
(ii)  where the bail bond surety company principally conducts transactions
authorized by its bail bond surety company  license.
(b)  The address of the place of business described in Subsection (1)(a) shall
appear upon:
(i)  the application for a bail bond surety company license; and
(ii)  the bail bond surety company license issued under this chapter.
(c)  A bail bond surety company shall notify the commissioner of any change in
the address required by this Subsection (1) within 20 days after the change.
(d)  This section does not prohibit a bail bond surety company from
maintaining the place of business required under this section in the
licensee's residence, if the residence is in Utah.
(2)  The bail bond surety company shall keep at the place of business
described in Subsection (1)(a) the records required under Section 31A-35-604.
